Washington statutes.
RCW 1.60.020

Medal of valor committee.

There is created the state medal of valor committee for selecting honorees for the award of the state medal of valor. The committee membership consists of the governor, president of the senate, speaker of the house of representatives, and the chief justice of the supreme court, or their designees. The secretary of state shall serve as a nonvoting ex officio member, and shall serve as secretary to the committee. The committee shall meet annually to consider candidates for this award. Any individual may nominate any resident or group of residents of this state for any act of valor covered by this section. The committee shall adopt rules establishing the qualifications for the state medal of valor, the protocol governing the decoration, the certificate, and appurtenances necessary to the implementation of this chapter.

[ 2015 c 4 s 2; 2000 c 224 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2015 c 4: See note following RCW 1.60.010.